Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1185.
do enact as follows:AB1185,11Section 1. 95.75 of the statutes is created to read:AB1185,2,2295.75 Cosmetic testing on animals. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1185,2,63(a) “Cosmetic” means any article intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or 4sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to any part of the human body for 5cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering its appearance, 6including personal hygiene products such as deodorant, shampoo, or conditioner.AB1185,2,97(b) “Cosmetic animal testing” means the internal or external application of a 8cosmetic or cosmetic ingredient to the skin, eyes, or other body part of a live, 9nonhuman vertebrate.AB1185,2,1110(c) “Cosmetic ingredient” has the meaning given for “ingredient” in 21 CFR 11700.3 (e).AB1185,2,1312(d) “Cosmetic manufacturer” means any person whose name appears on the 13label of a cosmetic as required under 21 CFR 701.12.AB1185,2,1514(2) Prohibited conduct. (a) Except as provided in par. (c), no cosmetic 15manufacturer may do any of the following:AB1185,2,17161. Conduct or contract for cosmetic animal testing that occurs in this state 17after December 31, 2026.AB1185,3,412. Manufacture or import for profit into this state any cosmetic or cosmetic 2ingredient if the cosmetic manufacturer knows or reasonably should know that the 3cosmetic or cosmetic ingredient was developed or manufactured using cosmetic 4animal testing conducted after December 31, 2026.AB1185,3,853. Beginning on July 1, 2027, sell or offer for sale in this state any cosmetic if 6the cosmetic manufacturer knows or reasonably should know that the cosmetic or a 7cosmetic ingredient in the cosmetic was developed or manufactured using cosmetic 8animal testing conducted after December 31, 2026.AB1185,3,119(b) For purposes of par. (a) 2. and 3., merely reviewing, assessing, or retaining 10evidence from a cosmetic animal test does not constitute developing or 11manufacturing using cosmetic animal testing.AB1185,3,1512(c) The prohibitions in par. (a) do not apply to cosmetic animal testing, or to a 13cosmetic or cosmetic ingredient for which cosmetic animal testing was conducted, if 14the cosmetic animal testing was conducted under any of the following 15circumstances:AB1185,3,17161. For the purpose of compliance with a requirement of a federal or state 17regulatory agency if all of the following apply:AB1185,3,1918a. The tested cosmetic ingredient is in wide use and cannot be replaced by 19another ingredient capable of performing a similar function.AB1185,3,2320b. A specific human health problem related to the cosmetic ingredient is 21substantiated that justifies the need to conduct the cosmetic animal testing, and 22the testing is supported by a detailed research protocol proposed as the basis for the 23evaluation of the cosmetic ingredient.AB1185,4,21c. There is not a method of testing other than cosmetic animal testing that is 2accepted for the relevant purpose by the federal or state regulatory agency.AB1185,4,632. For the purpose of compliance with a requirement of a regulatory agency of 4a foreign jurisdiction if no evidence derived from the cosmetic animal testing was 5relied upon to substantiate the safety of a cosmetic sold within this state by the 6cosmetic manufacturer.AB1185,4,873. On any cosmetic or cosmetic ingredient subject to the requirements of 21 8USC 351 to 360fff-8.AB1185,4,1094. Pursuant to a requirement of a federal, state, or foreign regulatory agency 10for a purpose unrelated to cosmetics if any of the following applies:AB1185,4,1211a. No evidence derived from the cosmetic animal testing was relied upon to 12substantiate the safety of the cosmetic.AB1185,4,1513b. There is documented evidence that the cosmetic animal testing of a 14cosmetic ingredient was conducted for a noncosmetic purpose and there has been at 15least 12 months of prior use of the cosmetic ingredient for a noncosmetic purpose.AB1185,4,1816(3) Penalty. Any person who violates this section is subject to a forfeiture of 17$5,000 for the violation and an additional $1,000 for each day the violation 18continues after the first day of the violation.AB1185,4,1919